Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.130

Public employees' retirement system plan 2 assets divided—Assets transferred to school employees' retirement system.

Upon the advice of the state actuary, the state treasurer shall divide the assets in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 as of September 1, 2000, in such a manner that sufficient assets remain in plan 2 to maintain the employee contribution rate calculated in the latest actuarial valuation of the public employees' retirement system plan 2. The state actuary shall take into account changes in assets that occur between the latest actuarial valuation and the date of transfer. The balance of the assets shall be transferred to the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 and 3.

[ 1998 c 341 s 407.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.